West Virginia, session 2026, HB5374.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 2. consumer credit protection. §46A-2-129b. Unsolicited robocalls and sales calls. No telemarketer using an auto-dialing system or "robo-calling" system shall place a telephone call or otherwise communicate by telephone with a consumer or third party, at any place, including a place of employment, to sell or propose the sale of an insurance-related,  warranty-related,  or to solicit donations to charities or any charitable donation-related  causes in this state.